New Mexico, session 2026, SB4.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Two million dollars ($2,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the health care authority for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to provide medicaid-directed payments to the university of New Mexico health sciences center for the purpose of increasing graduate medical education resident and fellow salaries. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .232840.1